test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-wapos_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - wâposw - ok : # -m animate noun, rabbit paradim Okim. p 135 
     
     wâpos+N+AN+Sg: wâpos
     wâpos+N+AN+Pl: wâposwak # not in Okimasis
     wâpos+N+AN+Loc: wâposonâhk # not in Okimasis
     
     wâpos+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwâposom
     wâpos+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwâposom
     wâpos+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: owâposoma
     wâpos+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: owâposomiyiwa
     wâpos+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwâposominân
     wâpos+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwâposominaw
     wâpos+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwâposomiwâw
     wâpos+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: owâposomiwâwa
     wâpos+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: owâposomiyiwa

     wâpos+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwâposomak
     wâpos+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwâposomak
     wâpos+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: owâposoma
     wâpos+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: owâposomiyiwa
     wâpos+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwâposominânak
     wâpos+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwâposominawak
     wâpos+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwâposomiwâwak
     wâpos+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: owâposomiwâwa
     wâpos+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: owâposomiyiwa
